Nebraska, session 109, LB739.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB739 LB739
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 25-21,271, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
25-21,271 (1) Any person desiring to change his or her name shall
file a petition in the district court of the county in which such person
may be a resident, setting forth (a) that the petitioner has been a bona
fide citizen of such county for at least one year prior to the filing of
the petition, (b) the address of the petitioner, (c) the date of birth of
the petitioner, (d) the cause for which the change of petitioner's name
is sought, and (e) the name asked for.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section,
notice of the filing of the petition shall be published in a newspaper in
the county, and if no newspaper is printed in the county, then in a
newspaper of general circulation therein. The notice shall be published
(i) once a week for four consecutive weeks if the petitioner is nineteen
years of age or older at the time the action is filed and (ii) once a
week for two consecutive weeks if the petitioner is under nineteen years
of age at the time the action is filed.
(b) The court may waive the notice requirement of subdivision (2)(a)
of this section upon a showing by the petitioner that such notice would
endanger the petitioner.
(3) In an action involving a petitioner under nineteen years of age
who has a noncustodial parent, notice of the filing of the petition shall
be sent by certified mail within five days after publication to the
noncustodial parent at the address provided to the clerk of the district
court pursuant to subsection (1) of section 42-364.13 for the
noncustodial parent if he or she has provided an address. The clerk of
the district court shall provide the petitioner with the address upon
request.
(4) It shall be the duty of the district court, upon being duly
satisfied by proof in open court of the truth of the allegations set
forth in the petition, that there exists proper and reasonable cause for
-2-

LB739 LB739
2026 2026
changing the name of the petitioner, and that notice of the filing of the
petition has been given as required by this section, to order and direct
a change of name of such petitioner and that an order for the purpose be
entered by the court.
(5) The clerk of the district court shall deliver a copy of any
name-change order issued by the court pursuant to this section to the
Department of Health and Human Services for use pursuant to sections
28-376 and 28-718 and to the sex offender registration and community
notification division of the Nebraska State Patrol for use pursuant to
section 29-4004.
Sec. 2. Original section 25-21,271, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-